Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1908.02
Patient care and management; defined.

Patient care
and management, as it relates to the practice of medical radiography, includes,
but is not limited to:

(1) Infection
control;

(2) Patient transfer and movement;

(3) Assisting patients
with medical equipment;

(4) Routine monitoring;

(5) Medical emergencies;

(6) Proper
use of contrast media; and

(7) Patient safety and protection, including minimizing and monitoring
patient radiation exposure through utilizing proper professional standards
and protocols, including the principle of as low as reasonably achievable.

Laws 2010, LB849, § 4.